Utah statutes.
63B-1-303.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Acquire or construct," "acquired or constructed," "constructed or acquired," "acquiring or constructing," or "acquisition or construction" means any acquisition, construction, reconstruction, restoration, enlargement, improvement, renovation, repair, replacement, equipping or furnishing, in whole or in part, of a facility.

(2)  "Authority" means the State Building Ownership Authority created by this part.

(3)  "Division" means the Division of Facilities Construction and Management.

(4) (a)  "Facility" or "facilities" means any public building, structure, highway, or property for any governmental purpose of state bodies, and the related and appurtenant easements, rights-of-way, improvements, paving, utilities, landscaping, parking facilities, and the lands, interests in land, and grounds, together with the personal property necessary, convenient, or appurtenant to them.

(b)  "Facility" includes a golf course.

(5)  "Mortgage" means any mortgage, trust deed, indenture, pledge agreement, assignment, security agreement, financing statement, or other instrument that encumbers property as security for obligations.

(6) (a)  "Obligations" means any mortgage certificates, notes, debentures, interim certificates, revenue bonds, or other evidences of financial indebtedness.

(b)  "Obligations" does not mean general obligation bonds.

(7) (a)  "State body" or "state bodies" means the state and any department, board, commission, or agency of the state.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (7)(c), "state body" or "state bodies" does not mean colleges and universities.

(c)  "State body" or "state bodies" includes a college or university when the obligation to be issued will finance the acquisition or construction of research facilities, housing facilities, or student centers at the college or university.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 86, 2003 General Session

